Illinois, session 104th, SB3524.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 5Marriage Act is amended by changing Sections 505 and 510 as 6follows: 7    (750 ILCS 5/505)  (from Ch. 40, par. 505)8    Sec. 505. Child support; contempt; penalties. 9    (a) In a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, legal 10separation, declaration of invalidity of marriage, or 11dissolution of a civil union, a proceeding for child support 12following a legal separation or dissolution of the marriage or 13civil union by a court that lacked personal jurisdiction over 14the absent spouse, a proceeding for modification of a previous 15order for child support under Section 510 of this Act, or any 16proceeding authorized under Section 501 or 601 of this Act, 17the court may order either or both parents owing a duty of 18support to a child of the marriage or civil union to pay an 19amount reasonable and necessary for support. The duty of 20support owed to a child includes the obligation to provide for 21the reasonable and necessary physical, mental and emotional 22health needs of the child. For purposes of this Section, the 23term "child" shall include any child under age 18 and any child   SB3524 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1over the age of 18 who has not attained age 19 and is still 2attending high school. For purposes of this Section, the term 3"obligor" means the parent obligated to pay support to the 4other parent.5        (1) Child support guidelines. The Illinois Department 6    of Healthcare and Family Services shall adopt rules 7    establishing child support guidelines which include 8    worksheets to aid in the calculation of the child support 9    obligations and a schedule of basic child support 10    obligations that reflects the percentage of combined net 11    income that parents living in the same household in this 12    State ordinarily spend on their child. The child support 13    guidelines have the following purposes:14            (A) to establish as State policy an adequate 15        standard of support for a child, subject to the 16        ability of parents to pay;17            (B) to make child support obligations more 18        equitable by ensuring more consistent treatment of 19        parents in similar circumstances;20            (C) to improve the efficiency of the court process 21        by promoting settlements and giving courts and the 22        parties guidance in establishing levels of child 23        support;24            (D) to calculate child support based upon the 25        parents' combined net income estimated to have been 26        allocated for the support of the child if the parents   SB3524 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        and child were living in an intact household;2            (E) to adjust child support based upon the needs 3        of the child; and4            (F) to allocate the amount of child support to be 5        paid by each parent based upon a parent's net income 6        and the child's physical care arrangements.7        (1.5) Computation of basic child support obligation. 8    The court shall compute the basic child support obligation 9    by taking the following steps:10            (A) determine each parent's monthly net income;11            (B) add the parents' monthly net incomes together 12        to determine the combined monthly net income of the 13        parents;14            (C) select the corresponding appropriate amount 15        from the schedule of basic child support obligations 16        based on the parties' combined monthly net income and 17        number of children of the parties; and18            (D) calculate each parent's percentage share of 19        the basic child support obligation.20        Although a monetary obligation is computed for each 21    parent as child support, the receiving parent's share is 22    not payable to the other parent and is presumed to be spent 23    directly on the child. 24        (2) Duty of support. The court shall determine child 25    support in each case by applying the child support 26    guidelines unless the court makes a finding that   SB3524 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    application of the guidelines would be inappropriate, 2    after considering the best interests of the child and 3    evidence which shows relevant factors including, but not 4    limited to, one or more of the following:5            (A) the financial resources and needs of the 6        child;7            (B) the financial resources and needs of the 8        parents;9            (C) the standard of living the child would have 10        enjoyed had the marriage or civil union not been 11        dissolved; and12            (D) the physical and emotional condition of the 13        child and his or her educational needs.14        (3) Income.15            (A) As used in this Section, "gross income" means 16        the total of all income from all sources, except 17        "gross income" does not include (i) benefits received 18        by the parent from means-tested public assistance 19        programs, including, but not limited to, Temporary 20        Assistance for Needy Families, Supplemental Security 21        Income, and the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 22        Program or (ii) benefits and income received by the 23        parent for other children in the household, including, 24        but not limited to, child support, survivor benefits, 25        and foster care payments. Social security disability 26        and retirement benefits paid for the benefit of the   SB3524 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        subject child must be included in the disabled or 2        retired parent's gross income for purposes of 3        calculating the parent's child support obligation, but 4        the parent is entitled to a child support credit for 5        the amount of benefits paid to the other party for the 6        child. "Gross income" includes maintenance treated as 7        taxable income for federal income tax purposes to the 8        payee and received pursuant to a court order in the 9        pending proceedings or any other proceedings and shall 10        be included in the payee's gross income for purposes 11        of calculating the parent's child support obligation. 12            (B) As used in this Section, "net income" means 13        gross income minus either the standardized tax amount 14        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (C) of this 15        paragraph (3) or the individualized tax amount 16        calculated pursuant to subparagraph (D) of this 17        paragraph (3), and minus any adjustments pursuant to 18        subparagraph (F) of this paragraph (3). The 19        standardized tax amount shall be used unless the 20        requirements for an individualized tax amount set 21        forth in subparagraph (E) of this paragraph (3) are 22        met. "Net income" includes maintenance not includable 23        in the gross taxable income of the payee for federal 24        income tax purposes under a court order in the pending 25        proceedings or any other proceedings and shall be 26        included in the payee's net income for purposes of   SB3524 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        calculating the parent's child support obligation.2            (C) As used in this Section, "standardized tax 3        amount" means the total of federal and state income 4        taxes for a single person claiming the standard tax 5        deduction, one personal exemption, and the applicable 6        number of dependency exemptions for the minor child or 7        children of the parties, and Social Security and 8        Medicare tax calculated at the Federal Insurance 9        Contributions Act rate.10                (I) Unless a court has determined otherwise or 11            the parties otherwise agree, the party with the 12            majority of parenting time shall be deemed 13            entitled to claim the dependency exemption for the 14            parties' minor child.15                (II) The Illinois Department of Healthcare and 16            Family Services shall promulgate a standardized 17            net income conversion table that computes net 18            income by deducting the standardized tax amount 19            from gross income.20            (D) As used in this Section, "individualized tax 21        amount" means the aggregate of the following taxes:22                (I) federal income tax (properly calculated 23            withholding or estimated payments);24                (II) State income tax (properly calculated 25            withholding or estimated payments); and26                (III) Social Security or self-employment tax,   SB3524 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            if applicable (or, if none, mandatory retirement 2            contributions required by law or as a condition of 3            employment) and Medicare tax calculated at the 4            Federal Insurance Contributions Act rate.5            (E) In lieu of a standardized tax amount, a 6        determination of an individualized tax amount may be 7        made under items (I), (II), or (III) below. If an 8        individualized tax amount determination is made under 9        this subparagraph (E), all relevant tax attributes 10        (including filing status, allocation of dependency 11        exemptions, and whether a party is to claim the use of 12        the standard deduction or itemized deductions for 13        federal income tax purposes) shall be as the parties 14        agree or as the court determines. To determine a 15        party's reported income, the court may order the party 16        to complete an Internal Revenue Service Form 4506-T, 17        Request for Tax Transcript. 18                (I) Agreement. Irrespective of whether the 19            parties agree on any other issue before the court, 20            if they jointly stipulate for the record their 21            concurrence on a computation method for the 22            individualized tax amount that is different from 23            the method set forth under subparagraph (D), the 24            stipulated method shall be used by the court 25            unless the court rejects the proposed stipulated 26            method for good cause.  SB3524 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1                (II) Summary hearing. If the court determines 2            child support in a summary hearing under Section 3            501 and an eligible party opts in to the 4            individualized tax amount method under this item 5            (II), the individualized tax amount shall be 6            determined by the court on the basis of 7            information contained in one or both parties' 8            Supreme Court approved Financial Affidavit (Family &9             Divorce Cases) and relevant supporting documents 10            under applicable court rules. No party, however, 11            is eligible to opt in unless the party, under 12            applicable court rules, has served the other party 13            with the required Supreme Court approved Financial 14            Affidavit (Family & Divorce Cases) and has 15            substantially produced supporting documents 16            required by the applicable court rules.17                (III) Evidentiary hearing. If the court 18            determines child support in an evidentiary 19            hearing, whether for purposes of a temporary order 20            or at the conclusion of a proceeding, item (II) of 21            this subparagraph (E) does not apply. In each such 22            case (unless item (I) governs), the individualized 23            tax amount shall be as determined by the court on 24            the basis of the record established. 25            (F) Adjustments to income.26                (I) Multi-family adjustment. If a parent is   SB3524 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            also legally responsible for support of a child 2            not shared with the other parent and not subject 3            to the present proceeding, there shall be an 4            adjustment to net income as follows:5                    (i) Multi-family adjustment with court 6                order. The court shall deduct from the 7                parent's net income the amount of child 8                support actually paid by the parent pursuant 9                to a support order unless the court makes a 10                finding that it would cause economic hardship 11                to the child.12                    (ii) Multi-family adjustment without court 13                order. Upon the request or application of a 14                parent actually supporting a presumed, 15                acknowledged, or adjudicated child living in 16                or outside of that parent's household, there 17                shall be an adjustment to child support. The 18                court shall deduct from the parent's net 19                income the amount of financial support 20                actually paid by the parent for the child or 21                75% of the support the parent should pay under 22                the child support guidelines (before this 23                adjustment), whichever is less, unless the 24                court makes a finding that it would cause 25                economic hardship to the child. The adjustment 26                shall be calculated using that parent's income   SB3524 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1                alone.2                (II) Spousal Maintenance adjustment. 3            Obligations pursuant to a court order for spousal 4            maintenance in the pending proceeding actually 5            paid or payable to the same party to whom child 6            support is to be payable or actually paid to a 7            former spouse pursuant to a court order shall be 8            deducted from the parent's after-tax income, 9            unless the maintenance obligation is tax 10            deductible to the payor for federal income tax 11            purposes, in which case it shall be deducted from 12            the payor's gross income for purposes of 13            calculating the parent's child support obligation.14        (3.1) Business income. For purposes of calculating 15    child support, net business income from the operation of a 16    business means gross receipts minus ordinary and necessary 17    expenses required to carry on the trade or business. As 18    used in this paragraph, "business" includes, but is not 19    limited to, sole proprietorships, closely held 20    corporations, partnerships, other flow-through business 21    entities, and self-employment. The court shall apply the 22    following:23            (A) The accelerated component of depreciation and 24        any business expenses determined either judicially or 25        administratively to be inappropriate or excessive 26        shall be excluded from the total of ordinary and   SB3524 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        necessary business expenses to be deducted in the 2        determination of net business income from gross 3        business income.4            (B) Any item of reimbursement or in-kind payment 5        received by a parent from a business, including, but 6        not limited to, a company car, reimbursed meals, free 7        housing, or a housing allowance, shall be counted as 8        income if not otherwise included in the recipient's 9        gross income, if the item is significant in amount and 10        reduces personal expenses.11        (3.2a) Unemployment or underemployment. If a parent is 12    voluntarily unemployed or underemployed, child support 13    shall be calculated based on a determination of potential 14    income. In determining potential income, the court shall 15    consider the specific circumstances of a party, to the 16    extent known, including, but not limited to, the parent's:17            (1) assets;18            (2) ownership of a substantial non-income 19        producing asset;20            (3) residence;21            (4) employment and earning history;22            (5) job skills;23            (6) educational attainment;24            (7) literacy;25            (8) age;26            (9) health;  SB3524 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            (10) criminal records and other employment 2        barriers; and3            (11) record of seeking work.4        The court shall also consider the local job market, 5    availability of local employers willing to hire the 6    parent, prevailing earning levels in the local community, 7    and other relevant background factors in the case. If 8    there is insufficient work history to determine employment 9    potential and probable earnings level, there shall be a 10    rebuttable presumption that the parent's potential income 11    is 75% of the most recent United States Department of 12    Health and Human Services Federal Poverty Guidelines for a 13    family of one person. Incarceration shall not be 14    considered voluntary unemployment for child support 15    purposes in establishing or modifying child support. 16        (3.2b) The court may impute income to a party only 17    upon conducting an evidentiary hearing or by agreement of 18    the parties. Imputation of income shall be accompanied by 19    specific written findings identifying the basis or bases 20    for imputation using these factors.21        (3.3) Rebuttable presumption in favor of guidelines. 22    There is a rebuttable presumption in any judicial or 23    administrative proceeding for child support that the 24    amount of the child support obligation that would result 25    from the application of the child support guidelines is 26    the correct amount of child support.   SB3524 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        (3.3a) Minimum child support obligation. There is a 2    rebuttable presumption that a minimum child support 3    obligation of $40 per month, per child, will be entered 4    for an obligor who has actual or imputed gross income at or 5    less than 100% 75% of the most recent United States 6    Department of Health and Human Services Federal Poverty 7    Guidelines for a family of one person, with a maximum 8    total child support obligation for that obligor of $120 9    per month to be divided equally among all of the obligor's 10    children.11        (3.3b) Zero dollar child support order. For parents 12    with no gross income, who receive only means-tested 13    assistance, or who cannot work due to a medically proven 14    disability, incarceration, or institutionalization, there 15    is a rebuttable presumption that the $40 per month minimum 16    support order is inapplicable and a zero dollar order 17    shall be entered. 18        (3.4) Deviation factors. In any action to establish or 19    modify child support, whether pursuant to a temporary or 20    final administrative or court order, the child support 21    guidelines shall be used as a rebuttable presumption for 22    the establishment or modification of the amount of child 23    support. The court may deviate from the child support 24    guidelines if the application would be inequitable, 25    unjust, or inappropriate. Any deviation from the 26    guidelines shall be accompanied by written findings by the   SB3524 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    court specifying the reasons for the deviation and the 2    presumed amount under the child support guidelines without 3    a deviation. These reasons may include:4            (A) extraordinary medical expenditures necessary 5        to preserve the life or health of a party or a child of 6        either or both of the parties;7            (B) additional expenses incurred for a child 8        subject to the child support order who has special 9        medical, physical, or developmental needs; and10            (C) any other factor the court determines should 11        be applied upon a finding that the application of the 12        child support guidelines would be inappropriate, after 13        considering the best interest of the child. 14        (3.5) Income in excess of the schedule of basic child 15    support obligation. A court may use its discretion to 16    determine child support if the combined adjusted net 17    income of the parties exceeds the highest level of the 18    schedule of basic child support obligation, except that 19    the basic child support obligation shall not be less than 20    the highest level of combined net income set forth in the 21    schedule of basic child support obligation. 22        (3.6) Extracurricular activities and school expenses. 23    The court, in its discretion, in addition to the basic 24    child support obligation, may order either or both parents 25    owing a duty of support to the child to contribute to the 26    reasonable school and extracurricular activity expenses   SB3524 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    incurred which are intended to enhance the educational, 2    athletic, social, or cultural development of the child.3        (3.7) Child care expenses. The court, in its 4    discretion, in addition to the basic child support 5    obligation, may order either or both parents owing a duty 6    of support to the child to contribute to the reasonable 7    child care expenses of the child. The child care expenses 8    shall be made payable directly to a party or directly to 9    the child care provider at the time of child care 10    services. 11            (A) "Child care expenses" means actual expenses 12        reasonably necessary to enable a parent or non-parent 13        custodian to be employed, to attend educational or 14        vocational training programs to improve employment 15        opportunities, or to search for employment. "Child 16        care expenses" also includes deposits for securing 17        placement in a child care program, the cost of before 18        and after school care, and camps when school is not in 19        session. A child's special needs shall be a 20        consideration in determining reasonable child care 21        expenses.22            (B) Child care expenses shall be prorated in 23        proportion to each parent's percentage share of 24        combined net income, and may be added to the basic 25        child support obligation if not paid directly by each 26        parent to the provider of child care services. The   SB3524 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        obligor's and obligee's portion of actual child care 2        expenses shall appear in the support order. If 3        allowed, the value of the federal income tax credit 4        for child care shall be subtracted from the actual 5        cost to determine the net child care costs.6            (C) The amount of child care expenses shall be 7        adequate to obtain reasonable and necessary child 8        care. The actual child care expenses shall be used to 9        calculate the child care expenses, if available. When 10        actual child care expenses vary, the actual child care 11        expenses may be averaged over the most recent 12-month 12        period. When a parent is temporarily unemployed or 13        temporarily not attending educational or vocational 14        training programs, future child care expenses shall be 15        based upon prospective expenses to be incurred upon 16        return to employment or educational or vocational 17        training programs.18            (D) An order for child care expenses may be 19        modified upon a showing of a substantial change in 20        circumstances. The party incurring child care expenses 21        shall notify the other party within 14 days of any 22        change in the amount of child care expenses that would 23        affect the annualized child care amount as determined 24        in the support order. 25        (3.8) Shared physical care. If parents have shared 26    physical care of a child, the court shall calculate the   SB3524 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    shared care child support obligation.2            (1) Shared Physical Care. Shared physical care 3        means each parent exercises 110 or more overnights per 4        year with the child, or 110 or more overnight 5        equivalents as determined by a court as a deviation 6        from guidelines or upon agreement by the parties. 7        Overnight equivalents are calculated by using a method 8        other than overnights if the parent has significant 9        parenting time periods on separate days in which the 10        child is in the parent's physical care and under the 11        direct care of that parent but does not stay 12        overnight.13            (2) Shared Care Child Support Obligation. If 14        parents have shared physical care of a child, the 15        basic child support obligation shall be multiplied by 16        1.5 to calculate the combined shared care child 17        support obligation. The court shall determine each 18        parent's portion of the shared care child support 19        obligation based on the parent's percentage share of 20        combined adjusted net income. The shared care child 21        support obligation is then computed for each parent by 22        multiplying that parent's portion of the shared care 23        support obligation by the percentage of time the child 24        spends with the other parent and determining any 25        adjustment for shared physical custody that is less 26        than 146 overnights or overnight equivalents. The   SB3524 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        respective shared care child support obligations are 2        then offset, with the parent owing more paying the 3        difference in child support.4            (3) Adjustment. When a parent has shared physical 5        care for less than 146 overnights or overnight 6        equivalents per year, the shared care child support 7        obligation for that parent shall be increased by the 8        percentage in the Adjustment Table below.9Number of OvernightsPercentage10110-11410%11115-1199%12120-1248%13125-1297%14130-1346%15135-1394%16140-1452%17            The shared care child support obligation after 18        adjustment may not be greater than the amount that 19        would have been ordered under the basic support 20        guidelines in any event.21            (4) The Department of Healthcare and Family 22        Services. The worksheets to calculate the shared care 23        child support obligation, including the adjustment, 24        shall be promulgated by the Department of Healthcare 25        and Family Services. If each parent exercises 146 or 26        more overnights per year with the child, the basic   SB3524 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        child support obligation is multiplied by 1.5 to 2        calculate the shared care child support obligation. 3        The court shall determine each parent's share of the 4        shared care child support obligation based on the 5        parent's percentage share of combined net income. The 6        child support obligation is then computed for each 7        parent by multiplying that parent's portion of the 8        shared care support obligation by the percentage of 9        time the child spends with the other parent. The 10        respective child support obligations are then offset, 11        with the parent owing more child support paying the 12        difference between the child support amounts. The 13        Illinois Department of Healthcare and Family Services 14        shall promulgate a worksheet to calculate child 15        support in cases in which the parents have shared 16        physical care and use the standardized tax amount to 17        determine net income.18        (3.9) Split physical care. When there is more than one 19    child and each parent has physical care of at least one but 20    not all of the children, the support is calculated by 21    using 2 child support worksheets to determine the support 22    each parent owes the other. The support shall be 23    calculated as follows:24            (A) compute the support the first parent would owe 25        to other parent as if the child in his or her care was 26        the only child of the parties; then  SB3524 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            (B) compute the support the other parent would owe 2        to the first parent as if the child in his or her care 3        were the only child of the parties; then4            (C) subtract the lesser support obligation from 5        the greater.6        The parent who owes the greater obligation shall be 7    ordered to pay the difference in support to the other 8    parent, unless the court determines, pursuant to other 9    provisions of this Section, that it should deviate from 10    the guidelines. 11        (4) Health care to be addressed by the court.12            (A) A portion of the basic child support 13        obligation is intended to cover basic ordinary 14        out-of-pocket medical expenses. The court, in its 15        discretion, in addition to the basic child support 16        obligation, shall also provide for the child's current 17        and future medical needs by ordering either or both 18        parents to initiate health insurance coverage for the 19        child through currently effective health insurance 20        policies held by the parent or parents, purchase one 21        or more or all health, dental, or vision insurance 22        policies for the child, or provide for the child's 23        current and future medical needs through some other 24        manner.25            (B) The court, in its discretion, may order either 26        or both parents to contribute to the reasonable health   SB3524 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        care needs of the child not covered by insurance, 2        including, but not limited to, unreimbursed medical, 3        dental, orthodontic, or vision expenses and any 4        prescription medication for the child not covered 5        under the child's health insurance.6            (C) If neither parent has access to appropriate 7        private health insurance coverage, the court may 8        order:9                (I) one or both parents to provide health 10            insurance coverage at any time it becomes 11            available at a reasonable cost; or12                (II) the parent or non-parent custodian with 13            primary physical responsibility for the child to 14            apply for public health insurance coverage for the 15            child and require either or both parents to pay a 16            reasonable amount of the cost of health insurance 17            for the child.18            The order may also provide that any time private 19        health insurance coverage is available at a reasonable 20        cost to that party it will be provided instead of cash 21        medical support. As used in this Section, "cash 22        medical support" means an amount ordered to be paid 23        toward the cost of health insurance provided by a 24        public entity or by another person through employment 25        or otherwise or for other medical costs not covered by 26        insurance.   SB3524 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            (D) The amount to be added to the basic child 2        support obligation shall be the actual amount of the 3        total health insurance premium that is attributable to 4        the child who is the subject of the order. If this 5        amount is not available or cannot be verified, the 6        total cost of the health insurance premium shall be 7        divided by the total number of persons covered by the 8        policy. The cost per person derived from this 9        calculation shall be multiplied by the number of 10        children who are the subject of the order and who are 11        covered under the health insurance policy. This amount 12        shall be added to the basic child support obligation 13        and shall be allocated between the parents in 14        proportion to their respective net incomes.15            (E) After the health insurance premium for the 16        child is added to the basic child support obligation 17        and allocated between the parents in proportion to 18        their respective incomes for child support purposes, 19        if the obligor is paying the premium, the amount 20        calculated for the obligee's share of the health 21        insurance premium for the child shall be deducted from 22        the obligor's share of the total child support 23        obligation. If the obligee is paying for private 24        health insurance for the child, the child support 25        obligation shall be increased by the obligor's share 26        of the premium payment. The obligor's and obligee's   SB3524 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        portion of health insurance costs shall appear in the 2        support order.3            (F) Prior to allowing the health insurance 4        adjustment, the parent requesting the adjustment must 5        submit proof that the child has been enrolled in a 6        health insurance plan and must submit proof of the 7        cost of the premium. The court shall require the 8        parent receiving the adjustment to annually submit 9        proof of continued coverage of the child to the other 10        parent, or as designated by the court.11            (G) A reasonable cost for providing health 12        insurance coverage for the child may not exceed 5% of 13        the providing parent's gross income. Parents with a 14        net income below 133% of the most recent United States 15        Department of Health and Human Services Federal 16        Poverty Guidelines or whose child is covered by 17        Medicaid based on that parent's income may not be 18        ordered to contribute toward or provide private 19        coverage, unless private coverage is obtainable 20        without any financial contribution by that parent.21            (H) If dental or vision insurance is included as 22        part of the employer's medical plan, the coverage 23        shall be maintained for the child. If not included in 24        the employer's medical plan, adding the dental or 25        vision insurance for the child is at the discretion of 26        the court.  SB3524 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            (I) If a parent has been directed to provide 2        health insurance pursuant to this paragraph and that 3        parent's spouse or legally recognized partner provides 4        the insurance for the benefit of the child either 5        directly or through employment, a credit on the child 6        support worksheet shall be given to that parent in the 7        same manner as if the premium were paid by that parent.8        (4.5) In a proceeding for child support following 9    dissolution of the marriage or civil union by a court that 10    lacked personal jurisdiction over the absent spouse, and 11    in which the court is requiring payment of support for the 12    period before the date an order for current support is 13    entered, there is a rebuttable presumption that the 14    obligor's net income for the prior period was the same as 15    his or her net income at the time the order for current 16    support is entered.17        (5) If the net income cannot be determined because of 18    default or any other reason, the court shall order support 19    in an amount considered reasonable in the particular case. 20    The final order in all cases shall state the support level 21    in dollar amounts. However, if the court finds that the 22    child support amount cannot be expressed exclusively as a 23    dollar amount because all or a portion of the obligor's 24    net income is uncertain as to source, time of payment, or 25    amount, the court may order a percentage amount of support 26    in addition to a specific dollar amount and enter such   SB3524 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    other orders as may be necessary to determine and enforce, 2    on a timely basis, the applicable support ordered.3        (6) If (i) the obligor was properly served with a 4    request for discovery of financial information relating to 5    the obligor's ability to provide child support, (ii) the 6    obligor failed to comply with the request, despite having 7    been ordered to do so by the court, and (iii) the obligor 8    is not present at the hearing to determine support despite 9    having received proper notice, then any relevant financial 10    information concerning the obligor's ability to provide 11    child support that was obtained pursuant to subpoena and 12    proper notice shall be admitted into evidence without the 13    need to establish any further foundation for its 14    admission.15    (a-3) Life insurance to secure support. At the discretion 16of the court, a child support obligation pursuant to this 17Section and Sections 510, 513, and 513.5 of this Act may be 18secured, in whole or in part, by reasonably affordable life 19insurance on the life of one or both parents on such terms as 20the parties agree or as the court orders. The court may require 21such insurance remain in full force and effect until the 22termination of all obligations of support, subject to the 23following:24        (1) Existing life insurance. The court shall be 25    apprised through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to 26    the level, ownership, and type of existing life insurance   SB3524 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    death benefit coverage available to one or both parents, 2    the cost of the premiums, cost ratings, and escalations 3    and assignment of the policy, if applicable, and all other 4    relevant circumstances. The court shall make findings 5    relative thereto.6        (2) New life insurance. The court shall be apprised 7    through evidence, stipulation, or otherwise as to the 8    availability of obtaining reasonably affordable new life 9    insurance. To the extent the court determines that the 10    support obligations should be secured, in whole or in 11    part, by new life insurance on the life of one or both 12    parents, the court may order that one or both parents 13    comply with all requirements to obtain such new life 14    insurance through employment, trade union, fraternal 15    organizations, associations, or individual means.16        In determining the level and type of death benefits 17    coverage to be obtained by a parent, the court shall 18    consider access and availability of life insurance to that 19    parent, the cost of the premium, cost ratings, and 20    escalations, if applicable, and all other relevant 21    circumstances.22        (3) Other security. If life insurance is unavailable 23    to a parent, the court, in its discretion, or as agreed to 24    by the parties, may order other equitable and reasonable 25    means to secure a child support obligation. 26    (a-5) In an action to enforce an order for child support   SB3524 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1based on the obligor's failure to make support payments as 2required by the order, notice of proceedings to hold the 3obligor in contempt for that failure may be served on the 4obligor by personal service or by regular mail addressed to 5the last known address of the obligor. The last known address 6of the obligor may be determined from records of the clerk of 7the court, from the Federal Case Registry of Child Support 8Orders, or by any other reasonable means.9    (b) Failure of either parent to comply with an order to pay 10support shall be punishable as in other cases of contempt. In 11addition to other penalties provided by law the court may, 12after finding the parent guilty of contempt, order that the 13parent be:14        (1) placed on probation with such conditions of 15    probation as the court deems advisable;16        (2) sentenced to periodic imprisonment for a period 17    not to exceed 6 months; provided, however, that the court 18    may permit the parent to be released for periods of time 19    during the day or night to:20            (A) work; or21            (B) conduct a business or other self-employed 22        occupation.23    The court may further order any part or all of the earnings 24of a parent during a sentence of periodic imprisonment paid to 25the Clerk of the Circuit Court or to the parent having physical 26possession of the child or to the non-parent custodian having   SB3524 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1custody of the child of the sentenced parent for the support of 2the child until further order of the court.3    If a parent who is found guilty of contempt for failure to 4comply with an order to pay support is a person who conducts a 5business or who is self-employed, the court in addition to 6other penalties provided by law may order that the parent do 7one or more of the following: (i) provide to the court monthly 8financial statements showing income and expenses from the 9business or the self-employment; (ii) seek employment and 10report periodically to the court with a diary, listing, or 11other memorandum of his or her employment search efforts; or 12(iii) report to the Department of Employment Security for job 13search services to find employment that will be subject to 14withholding for child support. 15    If there is a unity of interest and ownership sufficient 16to render no financial separation between an obligor and 17another person or persons or business entity, the court may 18pierce the ownership veil of the person, persons, or business 19entity to discover assets of the obligor held in the name of 20that person, those persons, or that business entity. The 21following circumstances are sufficient to authorize a court to 22order discovery of the assets of a person, persons, or 23business entity and to compel the application of any 24discovered assets toward payment on the judgment for support:25        (1) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 26    entity maintain records together.  SB3524 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        (2) the obligor and the person, persons, or business 2    entity fail to maintain an arm's length relationship 3    between themselves with regard to any assets.4        (3) the obligor transfers assets to the person, 5    persons, or business entity with the intent to perpetrate 6    a fraud on the obligee.7    With respect to assets which are real property, no order 8entered under this paragraph shall affect the rights of bona 9fide purchasers, mortgagees, judgment creditors, or other lien 10holders who acquire their interests in the property prior to 11the time a notice of lis pendens pursuant to the Code of Civil 12Procedure or a copy of the order is placed of record in the 13office of the recorder of deeds for the county in which the 14real property is located.15    The court may also order in cases where the parent is 90 16days or more delinquent in payment of support or has been 17adjudicated in arrears in an amount equal to 90 days 18obligation or more, that the parent's Illinois driving 19privileges be suspended until the court determines that the 20parent is in compliance with the order of support. The court 21may also order that the parent be issued a family financial 22responsibility driving permit that would allow limited driving 23privileges for employment and medical purposes in accordance 24with Section 7-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. The Clerk 25of the Circuit Court shall certify the order suspending the 26driving privileges of the parent or granting the issuance of a   SB3524 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1family financial responsibility driving permit to the 2Secretary of State on forms prescribed by the Secretary of 3State. Upon receipt of the authenticated documents, the 4Secretary of State shall suspend the parent's driving 5privileges until further order of the court and shall, if 6ordered by the court, subject to the provisions of Section 77-702.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, issue a family financial 8responsibility driving permit to the parent.9    In addition to the penalties or punishment that may be 10imposed under this Section, any person whose conduct 11constitutes a violation of Section 15 of the Non-Support 12Punishment Act may be prosecuted under that Act, and a person 13convicted under that Act may be sentenced in accordance with 14that Act. The sentence may include but need not be limited to a 15requirement that the person perform community service under 16Section 50 of that Act or participate in a work alternative 17program under Section 50 of that Act. A person may not be 18required to participate in a work alternative program under 19Section 50 of that Act if the person is currently 20participating in a work program pursuant to Section 505.1 of 21this Act.22    A support obligation, or any portion of a support 23obligation, which becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end 24of each month, excluding the child support that was due for 25that month to the extent that it was not paid in that month, 26shall accrue simple interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of   SB3524 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1the Code of Civil Procedure. An order for support entered or 2modified on or after January 1, 2006 shall contain a statement 3that a support obligation required under the order, or any 4portion of a support obligation required under the order, that 5becomes due and remains unpaid as of the end of each month, 6excluding the child support that was due for that month to the 7extent that it was not paid in that month, shall accrue simple 8interest as set forth in Section 12-109 of the Code of Civil 9Procedure. Failure to include the statement in the order for 10support does not affect the validity of the order or the 11accrual of interest as provided in this Section.12    (c) A one-time charge of 20% is imposable upon the amount 13of past-due child support owed on July 1, 1988 which has 14accrued under a support order entered by the court. The charge 15shall be imposed in accordance with the provisions of Section 1610-21 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and shall be enforced by 17the court upon petition.18    (d) Any new or existing support order entered by the court 19under this Section shall be deemed to be a series of judgments 20against the person obligated to pay support thereunder, each 21such judgment to be in the amount of each payment or 22installment of support and each such judgment to be deemed 23entered as of the date the corresponding payment or 24installment becomes due under the terms of the support order. 25Each such judgment shall have the full force, effect and 26attributes of any other judgment of this State, including the   SB3524 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1ability to be enforced. Notwithstanding any other State or 2local law to the contrary, a lien arises by operation of law 3against the real and personal property of the obligor for each 4installment of overdue support owed by the obligor.5    (e) When child support is to be paid through the Clerk of 6the Court in a county of 500,000 inhabitants or less, the order 7shall direct the obligor to pay to the Clerk, in addition to 8the child support payments, all fees imposed by the county 9board under paragraph (2) of subsection (j-5) of Section 27.1b 10of the Clerks of Courts Act. When child support is to be paid 11through the clerk of the court in a county of more than 500,000 12but less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the order shall direct 13the obligor to pay to the clerk, in addition to the child 14support payments, all fees imposed by the county board under 15paragraph (4) of subsection (bb) of Section 27.2 of the Clerks 16of Courts Act. Unless paid pursuant to an Income Withholding 17Order/Notice for Support, the payment of the fee shall be by 18payment acceptable to the clerk and shall be made to the order 19of the Clerk.20    (f) All orders for support, when entered or modified, 21shall include a provision requiring the obligor to notify the 22court and, in cases in which a party is receiving child and 23spouse services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 24Code, the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, within 257 days, (i) of the name and address of any new employer of the 26obligor, (ii) whether the obligor has access to health   SB3524 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1insurance coverage through the employer or other group 2coverage and, if so, the policy name and number and the names 3of persons covered under the policy, except only the initials 4of any covered minors shall be included, and (iii) of any new 5residential or mailing address or telephone number of the 6obligor. In any subsequent action to enforce a support order, 7upon a sufficient showing that a diligent effort has been made 8to ascertain the location of the obligor, service of process 9or provision of notice necessary in the case may be made at the 10last known address of the obligor in any manner expressly 11provided by the Code of Civil Procedure or this Act, which 12service shall be sufficient for purposes of due process.13    (g) An order for support shall include a date on which the 14current support obligation terminates. The termination date 15shall be no earlier than the date on which the child covered by 16the order will attain the age of 18. However, if the child will 17not graduate from high school until after attaining the age of 1818, then the termination date shall be no earlier than the 19earlier of the date on which the child's high school 20graduation will occur or the date on which the child will 21attain the age of 19. The order for support shall state that 22the termination date does not apply to any arrearage that may 23remain unpaid on that date. Nothing in this subsection shall 24be construed to prevent the court from modifying the order or 25terminating the order in the event the child is otherwise 26emancipated.  SB3524 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    (g-5) If there is an unpaid arrearage or delinquency (as 2those terms are defined in the Income Withholding for Support 3Act) equal to at least one month's support obligation on the 4termination date stated in the order for support or, if there 5is no termination date stated in the order, on the date the 6child attains the age of majority or is otherwise emancipated, 7the periodic amount required to be paid for current support of 8that child immediately prior to that date shall automatically 9continue to be an obligation, not as current support but as 10periodic payment toward satisfaction of the unpaid arrearage 11or delinquency. That periodic payment shall be in addition to 12any periodic payment previously required for satisfaction of 13the arrearage or delinquency. The total periodic amount to be 14paid toward satisfaction of the arrearage or delinquency may 15be enforced and collected by any method provided by law for 16enforcement and collection of child support, including but not 17limited to income withholding under the Income Withholding for 18Support Act. Each order for support entered or modified on or 19after January 1, 2005 (the effective date of Public Act 2093-1061) must contain a statement notifying the parties of the 21requirements of this subsection. Failure to include the 22statement in the order for support does not affect the 23validity of the order or the operation of the provisions of 24this subsection with regard to the order. This subsection 25shall not be construed to prevent or affect the establishment 26or modification of an order for support of a minor child or the   SB3524 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1establishment or modification of an order for support of a 2non-minor child or educational expenses under Section 513 of 3this Act. 4    (h) An order entered under this Section shall include a 5provision requiring both parents to exchange information 6annually, and either parent to report to the other parent and 7to the Clerk of Court within 10 days each time either parent 8obtains new employment, and each time either parent's 9employment is terminated for any reason. The information 10exchanged or reported report shall be in writing and shall 11verify the parent's net income as defined in this Section. In , 12in the case of new employment, the information shall include 13the name and address of the new employer. Failure to report new 14employment or the termination of current employment, if 15coupled with nonpayment of support for a period in excess of 60 16days, is indirect criminal contempt. For either parent 17arrested for failure to report new employment bond shall be 18set in the amount of the child support that should have been 19paid during the period of unreported employment. An order 20entered under this Section shall also include a provision 21requiring either obligor and obligee to advise the other of a 22change in residence within 5 days of the change except when the 23court finds that the physical, mental, or emotional health of 24a party or that of a child, or both, would be seriously 25endangered by disclosure of the party's address.26    (i) The court does not lose the powers of contempt,   SB3524 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1driver's license suspension, or other child support 2enforcement mechanisms, including, but not limited to, 3criminal prosecution as set forth in this Act, upon the 4emancipation of the minor child.5(Source: P.A. 103-967, eff. 1-1-25; 104-340, eff. 8-15-25.) 6    (750 ILCS 5/510)  (from Ch. 40, par. 510)7    Sec. 510. Modification and termination of provisions for 8maintenance, support, educational expenses, and property 9disposition.10    (a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (f) of 11Section 502 and in subsection (b), clause (3) of Section 12505.2, the provisions of any judgment respecting maintenance 13or support may be modified only as to installments accruing 14subsequent to due notice by the moving party of the filing of 15the motion for modification. An order for child support may be 16modified as follows:17        (1) upon a showing of a substantial change in 18    circumstances. Contemplation or foreseeability of future 19    events shall not be considered as a factor or used as a 20    defense in determining whether a substantial change in 21    circumstances is shown, unless the future event is 22    expressly specified in the court's order or the agreement 23    of the parties incorporated into a court order. The 24    parties may expressly specify in the agreement 25    incorporated into a court order or the court may expressly   SB3524 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    specify in the order that the occurrence of a specific 2    future event is contemplated and will not constitute a 3    substantial change in circumstances to warrant 4    modification of the order; and5        (2) without the necessity of showing a substantial 6    change in circumstances, as follows:7            (A) upon a showing of an inconsistency of at least 8        20%, but no less than $10 per month, between the amount 9        of the existing order and the amount of child support 10        that results from application of the guidelines 11        specified in Section 505 of this Act unless the 12        inconsistency is due to the fact that the amount of the 13        existing order resulted from a deviation from the 14        guideline amount and there has not been a change in the 15        circumstances that resulted in that deviation; or16            (B) upon a showing of a need to provide for the 17        health care needs of the child under the order through 18        health insurance or other means.19        (3) upon a showing that a parent will be incarcerated 20    for more than 180 consecutive days or released from 21    incarceration lasting more than 180 consecutive days. A 22    parent incarcerated for more than 180 days is presumed to 23    be unable to pay any amount of child support, and this 24    presumption may be rebutted by evidence establishing the 25    ability to pay child support during incarceration. A 26    parent released from incarceration after more than 180   SB3524 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    days is presumed to be able to pay the amount set forth in 2    paragraph (3.3a) of subsection (a) of Section 505, 3    following the expiration of 90 days after the date the 4    parent is released from incarceration. This Section does 5    not preclude any party, including the Department of 6    Healthcare and Family Services, from seeking a 7    modification of the child support obligation based upon 8    the ability to pay child support during or after 9    incarceration or for other reasons allowable by law.10            (A) "Incarceration," for the purposes of this 11        Section, means confinement of a parent on a full-time 12        basis in a place of detention, including home 13        detention or a municipal, county, state, or federal 14        prison, jail, or detention. It does not include a 15        parent on parole, work release, or any other detention 16        alternative program that allows the parent to be 17        employed or otherwise earn money.18            (B) "Effective date," for purposes of this 19        Section, means the date that a notice of incarceration 20        is filed with the circuit court clerk and mailed to the 21        parties under Illinois Supreme Court Rule 11.22            (C) If a parent will be incarcerated for more than 23        180 consecutive days, the parent's child support 24        obligation shall be modified to $0.00 by operation of 25        law if:26                (i) the Department of Healthcare and Family   SB3524 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            Services, or any other party, files with the 2            circuit court clerk a notice of incarceration and 3            provides notice under the Illinois Code of Civil 4            Procedure to all parties; and5                (ii) no written objection is filed with the 6            circuit court clerk, with notice provided to all 7            parties, within 45 days of the effective date of 8            the notice of incarceration.9            (D) A notice of incarceration must provide the 10        following information:11                (i) the name and address of the facility where 12            the parent is incarcerated; and13                (ii) the parent's inmate number; and14                (iii) the beginning and projected end dates of 15            incarceration, if known, or, if unknown, the 16            reason a date cannot be provided; and17                (iv) That failure to file a written objection 18            within 45 days of the effective date, with notice 19            to all parties under Illinois Supreme Court Rule 20            11, shall result in the child support obligation 21            being reduced to $0.00 as of the effective date of 22            the notice of incarceration.23            (E) A child support order reduced to $0.00 under 24        this Section shall be modified by operation of law to 25        the amount set forth in paragraph (3.3a) of subsection 26        (a) of Section 505 following the expiration of 90 days   SB3524 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        after the date the parent is released from 2        incarceration. This Section does not preclude any 3        party including the Department of Healthcare and 4        Family Services from seeking a modification of the 5        child support obligation based upon the ability to pay 6        child support during or after incarceration or for 7        other reasons allowable by statute.8            (F) The notice of incarceration shall be filed in 9        the jurisdiction in which any pending child support, 10        divorce, or paternity action between the parties 11        exists.12            (G) If any party files a timely objection to the 13        notice of incarceration, the court shall set the 14        matter for hearing as soon as practicable and send 15        notice of the hearing date to all parties including 16        HFS. The presumption that the parent is unable to pay 17        any amount of support may be rebutted by a 18        preponderance of the evidence at the hearing by 19        showing:20                (i) the parent has substantial income or 21            assets that can be used to satisfy the child 22            support obligation during incarceration; or23                (ii) the parent is not, or will not be, 24            incarcerated for more than 180 consecutive days. 25            If the presumption is rebutted, the court shall 26            make written findings as to the factual basis or   SB3524 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1            bases for the rebuttal.2            (H) If any party fails to file a timely objection, 3        or if a hearing is held and the Court determines that 4        the presumption has not been rebutted, the support 5        obligation shall be modified to $0.00 as of the 6        effective date of the notice of incarceration.7            (I) An order that modifies a support obligation to 8        $0.00 because of the parent's incarceration shall 9        provide that support will be modified by operation of 10        law at the amount set forth in subsection 3.3(a) of 11        Section 505, on the first day of the month following 12        the expiration of 90 days after the date the parent is 13        projected to be released from incarceration. The order 14        shall include the specific calendar date upon which 15        the first day of the month following the expiration of 16        90 days falls. The order shall further provide that if 17        the parent is released before or after the projected 18        release or parole date, support shall be reinstated at 19        the amount set forth in paragraph (3.3a) of subsection 20        (a) of Section 505 on the first day of the month 21        following the expiration of 90 days after the parent's 22        actual release date. The order shall further provide 23        that this Section does not preclude any party, 24        including the Department of Healthcare and Family 25        Services, from seeking a modification of the child 26        support obligation based upon the ability to pay child   SB3524 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1        support during or after incarceration or for other 2        reasons allowable by statute. 3    The provisions of subparagraph (a)(2)(A) shall apply only 4in cases in which a party is receiving child support 5enforcement services from the Department of Healthcare and 6Family Services under Article X of the Illinois Public Aid 7Code, and only when at least 36 months have elapsed since the 8order for child support was entered or last modified.9    The court may grant a petition for modification that seeks 10to apply the changes made to subsection (a) of Section 505 by 11subsequent Public Acts Act 99-764 to an order entered before 12the effective date of Public Act 99-764 only upon a finding of 13a substantial change in circumstances that warrants 14application of the changes. The enactment of a subsequent 15Public Act 99-764 itself does not constitute a substantial 16change in circumstances warranting a modification, unless 17otherwise expressly provided in that Public Act.18    (a-5) An order for maintenance may be modified or 19terminated only upon a showing of a substantial change in 20circumstances. Contemplation or foreseeability of future 21events shall not be considered as a factor or used as a defense 22in determining whether a substantial change in circumstances 23is shown, unless the future event is expressly specified in 24the court's order or the agreement of the parties incorporated 25into a court order. The parties may expressly specify in the 26agreement incorporated into a court order or the court may   SB3524 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1expressly specify in the order that the occurrence of a 2specific future event is contemplated and will not constitute 3a substantial change in circumstances to warrant modification 4of the order. The court may grant a petition for modification 5that seeks to apply the changes made to Section 504 by this 6amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly to an order 7entered before the effective date of this amendatory Act of 8the 100th General Assembly only upon a finding of a 9substantial change in circumstances that warrants application 10of the changes. The enactment of this amendatory Act of the 11100th General Assembly itself does not constitute a 12substantial change in circumstances warranting a modification. 13In all such proceedings, as well as in proceedings in which 14maintenance is being reviewed, the court shall consider the 15applicable factors set forth in subsection (a) of Section 504 16and the following factors:17        (1) any change in the employment status of either 18    party and whether the change has been made in good faith;19        (2) the efforts, if any, made by the party receiving 20    maintenance to become self-supporting, and the 21    reasonableness of the efforts where they are appropriate;22        (3) any impairment of the present and future earning 23    capacity of either party;24        (4) the tax consequences of the maintenance payments 25    upon the respective economic circumstances of the parties;26        (5) the duration of the maintenance payments   SB3524 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1    previously paid (and remaining to be paid) relative to the 2    length of the marriage;3        (6) the property, including retirement benefits, 4    awarded to each party under the judgment of dissolution of 5    marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 6    declaration of invalidity of marriage and the present 7    status of the property;8        (7) the increase or decrease in each party's income 9    since the prior judgment or order from which a review, 10    modification, or termination is being sought;11        (8) the property acquired and currently owned by each 12    party after the entry of the judgment of dissolution of 13    marriage, judgment of legal separation, or judgment of 14    declaration of invalidity of marriage; and15        (9) any other factor that the court expressly finds to 16    be just and equitable.17    (a-6) (Blank).18    (b) The provisions as to property disposition may not be 19revoked or modified, unless the court finds the existence of 20conditions that justify the reopening of a judgment under the 21laws of this State.22    (c) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties in a written 23agreement set forth in the judgment or otherwise approved by 24the court, the obligation to pay future maintenance is 25terminated upon the death of either party, or the remarriage 26of the party receiving maintenance, or if the party receiving   SB3524 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1maintenance cohabits with another person on a resident, 2continuing conjugal basis. An obligor's obligation to pay 3maintenance or unallocated maintenance terminates by operation 4of law on the date the obligee remarries or the date the court 5finds cohabitation began. The obligor is entitled to 6reimbursement for all maintenance paid from that date forward. 7Any termination of an obligation for maintenance as a result 8of the death of the obligor, however, shall be inapplicable to 9any right of the other party or such other party's designee to 10receive a death benefit under such insurance on the obligor's 11life. An obligee must advise the obligor of his or her 12intention to marry at least 30 days before the remarriage, 13unless the decision is made within this time period. In that 14event, he or she must notify the obligor within 72 hours of 15getting married.16    (c-5) In an adjudicated case, the court shall make 17specific factual findings as to the reason for the 18modification as well as the amount, nature, and duration of 19the modified maintenance award.20    (d) Unless otherwise provided in this Act, or as agreed in 21writing or expressly provided in the judgment, provisions for 22the support of a child are terminated by emancipation of the 23child, or if the child has attained the age of 18 and is still 24attending high school, provisions for the support of the child 25are terminated upon the date that the child graduates from 26high school or the date the child attains the age of 19,   SB3524 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1whichever is earlier, but not by the death of a parent 2obligated to support or educate the child. An existing 3obligation to pay for support or educational expenses, or 4both, is not terminated by the death of a parent. When a parent 5obligated to pay support or educational expenses, or both, 6dies, the amount of support or educational expenses, or both, 7may be enforced, modified, revoked or commuted to a lump sum 8payment, as equity may require, and that determination may be 9provided for at the time of the dissolution of the marriage or 10thereafter.11    (e) The right to petition for support or educational 12expenses, or both, under Sections 505, 513, and 513.5 is not 13extinguished by the death of a parent. Upon a petition filed 14before or after a parent's death, the court may award sums of 15money out of the decedent's estate for the child's support or 16educational expenses, or both, as equity may require. The time 17within which a claim may be filed against the estate of a 18decedent under Sections 505 and 513 and subsection (d) and 19this subsection shall be governed by the provisions of the 20Probate Act of 1975, as a barrable, noncontingent claim.21    (f) A petition to modify or terminate child support or the 22allocation of parental responsibilities, including parenting 23time, shall not delay any child support enforcement litigation 24or supplementary proceeding on behalf of the obligee, 25including, but not limited to, a petition for a rule to show 26cause, for non-wage garnishment, or for a restraining order.  SB3524 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 20266 JRC 33717 b1(Source: P.A. 102-541, eff. 8-20-21; 102-823, eff. 5-13-22.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 31, 2027.